North Dakota, session 69, HB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-01. Definitions.
In this chapter unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:
1. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
2. "Treatment or care center"Developmental disability" has the same meaning as in section
25 - 01.2 - 01 .
3. "Group home" means any community residential facility housing more than three individuals
with a developmental disability.
4. "Host home" means a community-based family home environment providing services to no
more than two individuals with a developmental disability who require ou t - o f - home placemen t
to facilitate delivery of intensive care and support.
5. "Provider agency" means an entity providing services to individuals with developmental
disabilities and licensed by the department to provide services.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-02. License required.
The operator of a treatment or care centerprovider agency for individuals with a developmental
disability shall secure annually from the department a license as required by rules adopted under this
chapter.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-03. Requirements for license.
The department shall issue a license for the operation of a treatment or care center foran agency
providing services to individuals with a developmental disability upon a showing that:

H. B. NO. 1109 - PAGE 2
1. The premises to be used are in fit, safe, sanitary condition, and properly equipped to provide
good care and treatment;
2. The persons in active charge of the center andprovider agency, including their assistants, are
qualified by training and experience to carry on efficiently the duties required of them;
3. The health, safety, and well-being of the residents cared for and treated therein will be
properly safeguardedindividuals receiving services are protected;
4. There is sufficient entertainmentA variety of meaningful activities, treatment, educational
opportunities, and physical facilities and services available to the residents thereinare
available;
5. Appropriate arrangements are made for a medical and psychological examination of each
residentindividual; and
6. The provider is in compliance with rules adopted by the department under this chapter.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-03.1. Conviction not bar to licensure - Exceptions.
Conviction of an offense does not disqualify a person from licensure under this chapter unless the
divisiondepartment determines that the offense has a direct bearing upon a person's ability to serve the
public as an owner or operator of a treatment or care center for individuals with a developmental
disabilityprovider agency, or that, following conviction of any offense, the person is not sufficiently
rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-04. Inspection and report by department.
The department may inspect the facilities and, premises, and records of the applicant or the
provider agency to determine the premises are fit, safe, and sanitary to provide quality care and
treatmentwhether the provider agency is in compliance with the rules of the department, to facilitate
verification of the information submitted with an application for licensure, to investigate complaints, and
to evaluate the implementation of a plan of correction.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-05. Content of license.
The license to operate a treatment or care center for individuals with a developmental disability
issued under the provisions of this chapter must specify:
1. The name of the licenseeprovider agency.
2. The premises to which the license is applicable.
3. The number of residents who may be received in such premises at any one timeoccupancy or
service limitations.
4. The date of expiration of the license.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1109 - PAGE 3
25-16-06. Department to prescribe forms - Rules.
The department may prescribe forms for the registration and record of the persons residing in
treatment or care centers for individuals with a developmental disabilityan eligible individual and may
adopt reasonable rules for the conduct of such centers as are necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-07. Records of treatment or care center confidentialConfidential records.
Except as otherwise authorized by law, an agent of the department or the superintendent of the life
skills and transition center or the licensee orprovider agency, their agents, or employees may not
disclose the contents of the individualan eligible individual's records of a treatment or care center for
individuals with a developmental disability, nor of the reports received from those records, except:
1. In a judicial proceeding when ordered by the presiding judge;
2. To a law enforcement official for a law enforcement purpose or any other legally constituted
boards or agencies serving the interests of the residentseligible individuals for treatment,
payment, or health care operations, to arrange, facilitate, or coordinate service to any such
person;
3. To the parents or legal guardians of the residenteligible individual;
4. To a physician to aid in the treatment of an individual within the fourth degree of consanguinity
of a deceased residenteligible individual, if the disclosure is limited to genetic health
information that has a direct bearing on the health of the relative, the relative's child, or the
relative's decision to have a child; or
5. To an individual who is within the fourth degree of consanguinity of a deceased residenteligible
individual, if the disclosure is limited to information about a residentan eligible individual
needed to establish a family's genealogy.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-08. Revocation of license.
The department may revoke a license of a treatment or care center for individuals with a
developmental disabilityprovider agency upon a proper showing that:
1. Any of the conditions set forth in section 25-16-03 as requirements for the issuance of the
license no longer exists;
2. The license was issued upon fraudulent or untrue representations;
3. The owner or operator has violated any of the rules of the department; or
4. The owner or operator of the centerprovider agency has been guilty of an offense determined
by the department to have a direct bearing upon a person's ability to serve the public as an
owner or operator, or the department determines, following conviction of an offense, that the
person is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1109 - PAGE 4
25-16-09. Hearing on denial or revocation of license.
Before any application for a license to conduct a treatment or care center for individuals with a
developmental disability is denied or before the revocation of such license by the department, written
charges as to the reasons for the revocation or denial must be served upon the applicant or
licenseeprovider agency, who has a right to a hearing before the department, if a hearing is requested
within ten days after service of written charges.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-12. Efforts to obtain private and governmental grants.
The department and the duly licensed treatment or care centers for individuals with a
developmental disabilityprovider agency may exert all possible efforts to obtain grants, both private and
governmental, for the care, custody, treatment, training, and education of individuals with a
developmental disability.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-13. Expenses chargeable against patienteligible individual, patient'seligible
individual's estate, or responsible relatives.
This chapter does not relieve the responsibility of the patienteligible individual, the patient'seligible
individual's estate, or responsible relatives of the expenses for care and treatment as provided in
chapter 25-04 or 50-06.3. The provisions of chapter 25-04 or 50-06.3 applicable to the expenses of care
and treatment of patients apply to this chapter.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-16-14. Definitions - Group homes for individuals with developmental disabilities - Zoning.
1. For the purposes of this section:
a. "Group home" means any community residential facility, foster home, family care facility,
or other similar home for individuals with a developmental disability.
b. "Individual with a developmental disability" means an individual with a severe, chronic
disability which:
(1) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and
physical impairments;
(2) Is manifested before the individual attains age twenty-two;
(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(4) Results in substantial functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of
major life activity:
(a) Self-care;
(b) Receptive and expressive language;
(c) Learning;
(d) Mobility;

H. B. NO. 1109 - PAGE 5
(e) Self-direction;
(f) Capacity for independent living; and
(g) Economic sufficiency; and
(5) Reflects the individual's needs for a combination and sequence of special,
interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services which are lifelong or
extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions in chapter 11-33, 40-47, or 58-03, or any other provisions
authorizing any political subdivision to establish or enforce zoning regulations, a licensed group home
serving six or fewer individuals with a developmental disability must be considered a permitted use in a
single-family or equivalent least-density residential zone, and a licensed group home serving eight or
fewer individuals with a developmental disability must be considered a permitted use in any area zoned
for residential use of greater density than single-family use.
SECTION 14. Three new sections to chapter 25-16 of the North Dakota Century Code are created
and enacted as follows:
Corrective actions.
1. If the department finds the provider agency is not in compliance with this chapter or the rules
adopted by the department, the department may notify the provider agency of required
corrective actions.
2. The provider agency shall submit a corrective action plan addressing the corrective actions.
3. If the provider agency fails to comply with the corrective action plan by the date certain for
correction, the department may:
a. Issue a restricted license; or
b. Revoke the license.
Purchase of services - Host home program.
1. The department may purchase residential care, custody, treatment, training, and education
services for individuals with developmental disabilities from a provider agency or a Medicaid-
enrolled provider, from funds appropriated for that purpose.
2. The department may establish a host home program to provide ou t - o f - home placemen t
habilitation and support services for Medicaid - eligible individuals with developmenta l
disabilities.
Federal requirements - Supremacy.
If any provision of this chapter is determined by the United States government to be in conflict with
existing or future requirements of the United States government so as to limit or preclude federal
financial participation in medical assistance, the department shall comply with the federal requirements
to the extent necessary to obtain federal financial participation and shall not comply with the provisions
of this chapter if necessary to avoid a loss of federal financial participation.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
25-16.1-01. Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

H. B. NO. 1109 - PAGE 6
1. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
2. "Treatment or care centerProvider agency" means an entity providing services to individuals
with developmental disabilities and licensed by the department to provide services.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
25-16.1-02. Conditions for appointment of receiver.
When the department has revoked the license of a treatment or care centerprovider agency, or
when the operator of a centerprovider agency has requested, the department may file a petition with the
district court to place the centerprovider agency under the control of a receiver if necessary to protect
the health or safety of clients at the centerprovider agency. The court may grant the petition upon a
finding that the health or safety of the clients at the centerprovider agency would be seriously
threatened if a condition existing at the time the petition was filed is permitted to continue. Such a
finding may be based upon evidence concerning the physical plant, the program and services offered
by the centerprovider agency, but not solely upon evidence that a centerprovider agency:
1. Has been denied a license to operate as a centerprovider agency, or has had a previously
issued license revoked; or
2. Has been denied certification as an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual
disabilities, or has lost or had revoked such certification.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
25-16.1-03. Appointment of receiver.
The court shall appoint, as receiver, the executive directorcommissioner of the department who
shall designate a qualified individual not employed by this state or its political subdivisions, or a
nonprofit organization to execute the receivership. The receiver appointed by the court shall use the
income and assets of the treatment or care centerprovider agency to maintain and operate the
centerprovider agency and to attempt to correct the conditions which constitute a threat to the clients.
The receiver may not liquidate the assets of the treatment or care centerprovider agency.
SECTION 18. AMENDMENT. Section 25-16.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
25-16.1-04. Termination of receivership.
The receivership shall be terminated when the receiver and the court certify that the conditions
which prompted the appointment have been corrected, when the license is restored, when a new
license is issued, or, in the case of an election by the owner or owners to discontinue operation, when
the clients are safely placed or provided services in other centersprovider agencies.
SECTION 19. REPEAL. Chapter 25-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 20. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1109 - PAGE 7
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1109 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State